Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.380

Nonresident pharmacies—Information required—Inspection.

A nonresident pharmacy shall:

(1) Submit to the department, upon request, information acceptable to the secretary concerning controlled substances shipped, mailed, or delivered to a Washington resident.

(2) Submit to on-site inspection by the department of the nonresident pharmacy's prescription records if the information in subsection (1) of this section is not provided to the department upon request.

[ 1991 c 87 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1991 c 87: See note following RCW 18.64.350.